Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-94] Completion report. Within
thirty days after the completion of construction or alteration of any stream
diversion work, the permittee shall file a written statement of completion with
the commission. The commission shall designate the form of such statement and
such information as it shall require. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next